ko: 드럼 키 핸들 유형: 인체공학적 몰딩 핸들; L자형; 라쳇 핸들; 스피드 키 (스피너); T 핸들; 윙 핸들; 기타
pt-BR: Estilo do cabo da chave do tambor: Alça ergonômica moldada; Formato em L; Alavanca de catraca; Chave rápida (spinner); Cabo em T; Alça borboleta; Outro
cs: Styl rukojeti bubnového klíče: Ergonomická tvarovaná rukojeť; Ve tvaru L; Ráčnová rukojeť; Rychloklíč (klička); Ve tvaru T; Křídlová rukojeť; Ostatní
de: Griffart des Stimmschlüssels: Ergonomisch geformter Griff; L-förmig; Ratschengriff; Speed Key (Kurbel); T-Griff; Flügelgriff; Sonstige
en: Drum key handle style: Ergonomic molded handle; L-shaped; Ratchet handle; Speed key (spinner); T-handle; Wing handle; Other
ro-RO: Stilul cu mâner al cheii tobă: Mâner turnat ergonomic; În formă de L; Mâner cu clichet; Cheie rapidă (manivelă rotativă); Mâner în formă de T; Mâner fluture; Altele
zh-CN: 鼓键手柄样式: 符合人体工程学的注塑手柄; L 型; 棘轮手柄; 速调手柄（旋转器）; T 型手柄; 翼型手柄; 其他
hu: Dobkulcs fogantyú stílusa: Ergonomikus öntött markolat; L alakú; Racsnis markolat; Gyorshangoló kulcs (forgó); T-fogantyú; Szárnyas fogantyú; Egyéb
sl-SI: Oblika ročaja ključa za bobne: Ergonomski oblikovan ročaj; V obliki črke L; Zaskočni ročaj; Hitri ključ (vrtljivi); T-ročaj; Krilati ročaj; Drugo
ru: Стиль рукоятки барабанного ключа: Эргономичная литая ручка; Г-образная; Трещоточная ручка; Скоростной ключ (вертушка); Т-образная ручка; Барашковая ручка; Другое
es: Estilo de manijas de llaves de tambor: Mango moldeado ergonómico; En forma de L; Mango de trinquete; Llave rápida (giratoria); Mango en T; Mango de mariposa; Otro
sv: Trumnyckelns handtagsstil: Ergonomiskt gjutet handtag; L-formad; Spärrhandtag; Snabbnyckel (snurra); T-handtag; Vinghandtag; Övrigt
lt-LT: Būgno rakto rankenos stilius: Ergonomiška lieta rankena; L formos; Reketinė rankena; Greitasis raktas (sukiklis); T formos rankena; Sparnuotoji rankena; Kita
nb: Trommelnøkkelreferansestil: Ergonomisk støpt håndtak; L-formet; Skrallehåndtak; Hurtignøkkel (sveiv); T-håndtak; Vingehåndtak; Annet
ja: ドラムキーハンドルスタイル: 人間工学に基づいた成形ハンドル; L字型; ラチェットハンドル; スピードキー (スピナー); Tハンドル; ウィングハンドル; その他
it: stile handle a chiave di tamburo: Impugnatura sagomata ergonomica; A L; Impugnatura a cricchetto; Chiave rapida (a manovella); Impugnatura a T; Impugnatura a farfalla; Altro
vi: Kiểu tay cầm khóa trống: Cán đúc công thái học; Chữ L; Cán bánh cóc; Khóa tốc độ (có tay quay); Cán chữ T; Cán tai hồng; Khác
sk-SK: Štýl rukoväti ladiaceho kľúča na bubon: Ergonomická tvarovaná rukoväť; Tvar L; Račňová rukoväť; Rýchlostný kľúč (rotačný); T-rukoväť; Krídlová rukoväť; Iné
da: Stemmenøglens håndtagsdesign: Ergonomisk formstøbt håndtag; L-formet; Skraldehåndtag; Speed key (spinner); T-håndtag; Vingehåndtag; Andet
tr: Davul anahtarı sap türü: Ergonomik kalıplı sap; L tipi; Cırcırlı sap; Hızlı anahtar (çark); T saplı; Kelebek sap; Diğer
pl: Styl uchwytu klucza perkusyjnego: Ergonomiczny profilowany uchwyt; W kształcie litery L; Rączka z grzechotką; Korbowy (spinner); Z uchwytem typu T; Uchwyt motylkowy; Inny
pt-PT: estilo de identificador de chave de bateria: Pega ergonómica moldada; Formato em L; Pega com roquete; Chave rápida (giratória); Pega em T; Pega em borboleta; Outro
nl: Drumsleutel handvat stijl: Ergonomische voorgevormde handgreep; L-vormig; Ratelhandgreep; Snelsleutel (spinner); T-handgreep; Vleugelhandgreep; Anders
el: Στυλ λαβής κλειδιού τυμπάνου: Εργονομική χυτή λαβή; Σχήματος L; Λαβή με καστάνια; Κλειδί ταχύτητας (spinner); Λαβή T; Λαβή-πεταλούδα; Άλλο
hr-HR: Tipka bubnja korisničko ime stil: Ergonomska lijevana ručka; L-oblik; Ručka s čegrtaljkom; Ključ za brzo zatezanje (spinner); T-ručka; Krilata ručka; Ostalo
fi: Rummun viritysavaimen kahvatyyli: Ergonominen muotoiltu kahva; L-muotoinen; Räikkäkahva; Pika-avain (pyöritin); T-kahva; Siipikahva; Muu
zh-TW: 鼓調音鑰匙握柄樣式: 人體工學模製把手; L 型; 棘輪把手; 快速鼓鎖 (旋轉式); T 型把手; 蝶形把手; 其他
fr: Style de poignée de clé de batterie: Poignée moulée ergonomique; En L; Poignée à cliquet; Clé rapide (rotative); Poignée en T; Poignée papillon; Autre
th: รูปแบบด้ามจับของกุญแจตั้งกลอง: แฮนเดิลขึ้นรูปตามหลักสรีรศาสตร์; รูปตัว L; แฮนเดิลแบบมีเฟือง; กุญแจปรับความเร็ว (สปินเนอร์); แฮนเดิลรูปตัว T; แฮนเดิลแบบปีกผีเสื้อ; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Стил на ръкохватката на ключа за барабани: Ергономична формована дръжка; Г-образна; Дръжка с тресчотка; Бърз ключ (въртящ се); Т-образна дръжка; Крилчата дръжка; Друго